Nebraska, session 109, LB938.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature declares that the purpose of allowing
taxable income to be reduced by contributions to and earnings from a
first-time home buyer savings account is to encourage first-time home
ownership through incentivizing saving for a down payment and closing
costs because of the significant financial and civic benefits home
ownership provides for this state.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account
Act:
(1) Account holder means an individual who establishes an account
with a financial institution that is designated as a first-time home
buyer savings account;
(2) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(3) Eligible expenses means a down payment and any closing costs
included on a real estate settlement statement, including, but not
limited to, appraisal fees, mortgage origination fees, and inspection
fees or any down payment costs and fees that may be included as part of
financing the construction of a primary residence;
(4) Financial institution means a bank, savings bank, building and
loan association, savings and loan association, or credit union, whether
chartered by the United States, the Department of Banking and Finance, or
a foreign state agency; any other similar organization which is covered
by federal deposit insurance; or a trust company;
(5) First-time home buyer means an individual who:
(a) Has never owned or purchased under contract for deed, either
individually or jointly, a single-family, owner-occupied primary
residence, including, but not limited to, a condominium unit or a
manufactured or mobile home that is assessed and taxed as real property;
or
(b) As a result of the individual's dissolution of marriage, has not
-2-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
been listed on a property title for at least three consecutive years or
more;
(6) First-time home buyer savings account or account means an
account with a financial institution designated as a first-time home
buyer savings account in accordance with section 4 of this act; and
(7) Qualified beneficiary means a first-time home buyer designated
by an account holder for whom the money in a first-time home buyer
savings account is or will be used for eligible expenses for the purchase
of the qualified beneficiary's primary residence.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, any individual may open an
account with a financial institution and designate the account, in its
entirety, as a first-time home buyer savings account to be used to pay or
reimburse a qualified beneficiary's eligible expenses for the purchase or
construction of a primary residence in Nebraska. An individual may be the
account holder of multiple accounts, and an individual may jointly own
the account with another person if they file a joint income tax return.
To be eligible for the subtraction under subsection (27) of section
77-2716, an account holder must comply with the requirements of this
section.
(2) An account holder must designate, no later than April 15 of the
year following the taxable year during which the account is established,
a first-time home buyer as the qualified beneficiary of the first-time
home buyer savings account. The account holder may designate himself or
herself as the qualified beneficiary. The account holder may change the
designated qualified beneficiary at any time, but there shall not be more
than one qualified beneficiary at any time. An account holder shall not
have multiple accounts with the same qualified beneficiary, but an
individual may be designated as the qualified beneficiary of multiple
accounts.
(3) The following limits apply to a first-time home buyer savings
account:
-3-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
(a) The maximum contribution to a first-time home buyer savings
account for a taxable year is five thousand dollars for an individual and
ten thousand dollars for account holders who file a joint return; and
(b) The maximum amount of all contributions for all taxable years to
a first-time home buyer savings account is twenty-five thousand dollars
for an individual and fifty thousand dollars for account holders who file
a joint return.
(4) Money may remain in a first-time home buyer savings account for
unlimited duration without the contributions being subject to recapture
or penalty.
(5) The account holder shall not use money in an account to pay
expenses of administering the account, except that a service fee may be
deducted from the account by a financial institution.
(6) The account holder is responsible for maintaining documentation
for the first-time home buyer savings account and for eligible expenses
related to the qualified beneficiary's purchase of his or her primary
residence.
Sec. 5. (1)(a) The money in a first-time home buyer savings account
may be:
(i) Used for eligible expenses related to a qualified beneficiary's
purchase or construction of his or her primary residence in this state;
(ii) Used for eligible expenses related to a qualified beneficiary's
purchase or construction of his or her primary residence in or outside
the state if the qualified beneficiary is active-duty military and was
stationed in Nebraska for any time after the creation of the account;
(iii) Used for expenses that would have qualified under subdivision
(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section, but the contract for purchase or
construction did not close;
(iv) Transferred to another newly created first-time home buyer
savings account; or
(v) Used to pay a service fee that is assessed and deducted by the
-4-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
financial institution.
(b) Subdivision (1)(a) of this section applies regardless of whether
the qualified beneficiary is the sole owner of the primary residence or a
joint owner with another person who does not qualify as a qualified
beneficiary.
(c) The money in a first-time home buyer savings account may not be
used for the purposes described in subdivisions (1)(a)(i), (ii), and
(iii) of this section if the primary residence being purchased or
constructed is a manufactured or mobile home that is not taxed as real
property.
(2)(a) Money withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account
is subject to recapture in the taxable year in which it is withdrawn if:
(i) At the time of the withdrawal, it has been less than a year
since the first deposit in the first-time home buyer savings account; or
(ii) The money is used for any purpose other than those authorized
in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The amount subject to recapture shall be added to federal
adjusted gross income pursuant to subdivision (27)(b) of section 77-2716.
(3) If any money is subject to recapture pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a)(ii) of this section, the account holder shall pay to the department a
penalty in the same taxable year as the recapture. If the withdrawal is
made ten or fewer years after the first deposit in the first-time home
buyer savings account, the penalty is equal to five percent of the amount
subject to recapture. If the withdrawal is made more than ten years after
the first deposit in the account, the penalty is equal to ten percent of
the amount subject to recapture. The penalties provided in this
subsection do not apply if:
(a) The money is used for eligible expenses related to a qualified
beneficiary's purchase or construction of his or her primary residence
outside of the state; or
(b) The money is from a first-time home buyer savings account for
-5-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
which the qualified beneficiary dies and the account holder does not
designate a new qualified beneficiary during the same taxable year.
(4) If the account holder or, if the first-time home buyer savings
account is jointly owned, the account holders die, all of the money in
the account that was subtracted from taxable income is subject to
recapture in the taxable year of the death or deaths, but no penalty is
due to the department.
Sec. 6. The department shall establish a form for an account holder
to annually report information about a first-time home buyer savings
account, including, but not limited to, how the money from the account is
used, and shall identify any supporting documentation that is required to
be maintained. To be eligible for the subtraction in subsection (27) of
section 77-2716, an account holder must annually file with his or her
state income tax return the completed form, the 1099 form for the account
issued by the financial institution, and any other supporting
documentation the department requires.
Sec. 7. (1) A financial institution is not required to:
(a) Designate an account as a first-time home buyer savings account,
or designate the qualified beneficiaries of an account, in the financial
institution's account contracts or systems or in any other way;
(b) Track the use of money withdrawn from a first-time home buyer
savings account; or
(c) Report any information to the department or any other
governmental agency that is not otherwise required by law.
(2) A financial institution is not responsible or liable for:
(a) Determining or ensuring that an account holder is eligible for a
subtraction under subsection (27) of section 77-2716;
(b) Determining or ensuring that money in the account is used for an
eligible expense; or
(c) Reporting or remitting taxes or penalties related to the use of
money in a first-time home buyer savings account.
-6-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
(3) In implementing the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act,
the department shall not establish any administrative, reporting, or
other requirements on financial institutions that are outside the scope
of normal account procedures.
Sec. 8. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act.
Sec. 9. Section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2716 (1) The following adjustments to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be made for interest or dividends received:
(a)(i) There shall be subtracted interest or dividends received by
the owner of obligations of the United States and its territories and
possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the
United States to the extent includable in gross income for federal income
tax purposes but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the
United States; and
(ii) There shall be subtracted interest received by the owner of
obligations of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions or
authorities which are Build America Bonds to the extent includable in
gross income for federal income tax purposes;
(b) There shall be subtracted that portion of the total dividends
and other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection as reported to the recipient by the regulated investment
company;
(c) There shall be added interest or dividends received by the owner
of obligations of the District of Columbia, other states of the United
States, or their political subdivisions, authorities, commissions, or
instrumentalities to the extent excluded in the computation of gross
income for federal income tax purposes except that such interest or
-7-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
dividends shall not be added if received by a corporation which is a
regulated investment company;
(d) There shall be added that portion of the total dividends and
other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection and excluded for federal income tax purposes as reported to
the recipient by the regulated investment company; and
(e)(i) Any amount subtracted under this subsection shall be reduced
by any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the obligations or
securities described in this subsection or the investment in the
regulated investment company and by any expenses incurred in the
production of interest or dividend income described in this subsection to
the extent that such expenses, including amortizable bond premiums, are
deductible in determining federal taxable income.
(ii) Any amount added under this subsection shall be reduced by any
expenses incurred in the production of such income to the extent
disallowed in the computation of federal taxable income.
(2) There shall be allowed a net operating loss derived from or
connected with Nebraska sources computed under rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent
possible under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the
United States. For a resident individual, estate, or trust, the net
operating loss computed on the federal income tax return shall be
adjusted by the modifications contained in this section. For a
nonresident individual, estate, or trust or for a partial-year resident
individual, the net operating loss computed on the federal return shall
be adjusted by the modifications contained in this section and any
carryovers or carrybacks shall be limited to the portion of the loss
derived from or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income for
all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the amount of
-8-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
any state income tax refund to the extent such refund was deducted under
the Internal Revenue Code, was not allowed in the computation of the tax
due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and is included in federal
adjusted gross income.
(4) Federal adjusted gross income, or, for a fiduciary, federal
taxable income shall be modified to exclude the portion of the income or
loss received from a small business corporation with an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or from a limited
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is not derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources as determined in section 77-2734.01.
(5) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or,
for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income dividends
received or deemed to be received from corporations which are not subject
to the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income a portion
of the income earned by a corporation subject to the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 that is actually taxed by a foreign country or one of its
political subdivisions at a rate in excess of the maximum federal tax
rate for corporations. The taxpayer may make the computation for each
foreign country or for groups of foreign countries. The portion of the
taxes that may be deducted shall be computed in the following manner:
(a) The amount of federal taxable income from operations within a
foreign taxing jurisdiction shall be reduced by the amount of taxes
actually paid to the foreign jurisdiction that are not deductible solely
because the foreign tax credit was elected on the federal income tax
return;
(b) The amount of after-tax income shall be divided by one minus the
maximum tax rate for corporations in the Internal Revenue Code; and
(c) The result of the calculation in subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall be subtracted from the amount of federal taxable income
-9-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
used in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The result of such
calculation, if greater than zero, shall be subtracted from federal
taxable income.
(7) Federal adjusted gross income shall be modified to exclude any
amount repaid by the taxpayer for which a reduction in federal tax is
allowed under section 1341(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(8)(a) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced, to the extent
included, by income from interest, earnings, and state contributions
received from the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as provided in
sections 77-1415 to 77-1430 and any account established under the
achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections
77-1401 to 77-1409.
(b) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced by any contributions
as a participant in the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, any
contributions to an account established under the achieving a better life
experience program made for the benefit of a beneficiary as provided in
sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, or any contributions to the Give to Enable
Support Cash Fund as provided in the Give to Enable Support Act, to the
extent not deducted for federal income tax purposes, but not to exceed
five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten thousand
dollars for any other return. With respect to a qualified rollover within
the meaning of section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code from another
state's plan, any interest, earnings, and state contributions received
from the other state's educational savings plan which is qualified under
section 529 of the code shall qualify for the reduction provided in this
subdivision. For contributions by a custodian of a custodial account
including rollovers from another custodial account, the reduction shall
only apply to funds added to the custodial account after January 1, 2014.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-10-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced, to the extent included in
the adjusted gross income of an individual, by the amount of any
contribution made by the individual's employer into an account under the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust owned by the individual, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten
thousand dollars for any other return.
(d) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased by:
(i) The amount resulting from the cancellation of a participation
agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a participant in the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust to the extent previously deducted under
subdivision (8)(b) of this section; and
(ii) The amount of any withdrawals by the owner of an account
established under the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409 for nonqualified expenses to the
extent previously deducted under subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(9)(a) For income tax returns filed after September 10, 2001, for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2006, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be increased by eighty-five percent of any amount of any federal bonus
depreciation received under the federal Job Creation and Worker
Assistance Act of 2002 or the federal Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003,
under section 168(k) or section 1400L of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, for assets placed in service after September 10, 2001,
and before December 31, 2005.
(b) For a partnership, limited liability company, cooperative,
including any cooperative exempt from income taxes under section 521 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative
association, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture, the increase
-11-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
shall be distributed to the partners, members, shareholders, patrons, or
beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed for use against
their income tax liabilities.
(c) For a corporation with a unitary business having activity both
inside and outside the state, the increase shall be apportioned to
Nebraska in the same manner as income is apportioned to the state by
section 77-2734.05.
(d) The amount of bonus depreciation added to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income by
this subsection shall be subtracted in a later taxable year. Twenty
percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added back by this
subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2003, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may be
subtracted in the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following taxable
years. Twenty percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added
back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first taxable year
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of
the next four following taxable years.
(10) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased
by the amount of any capital investment that is expensed under section
179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is in excess
of twenty-five thousand dollars that is allowed under the federal Jobs
and Growth Tax Act of 2003. Twenty percent of the total amount of
expensing added back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed
-12-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
to begin on or after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first
taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent
in each of the next four following tax years.
(11)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before
January 1, 2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by contributions, up to
two thousand dollars per married filing jointly return or one thousand
dollars for any other return, and any investment earnings made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the Long-
Term Care Savings Plan Act, to the extent not deducted for federal income
tax purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal
adjusted gross income shall be increased by the withdrawals made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the act by
a person who is not a qualified individual or for any reason other than
transfer of funds to a spouse, long-term care expenses, long-term care
insurance premiums, or death of the participant, including withdrawals
made by reason of cancellation of the participation agreement, to the
extent previously deducted as a contribution or as investment earnings.
(12) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income for
individuals, estates, and trusts any amount taken as a credit for
franchise tax paid by a financial institution under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 as allowed by subsection (5) of section 77-2715.07.
(13)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced
by the amount received as benefits under the federal Social Security Act
which are included in the federal adjusted gross income if:
(i) For taxpayers filing a married filing joint return, federal
-13-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
adjusted gross income is fifty-eight thousand dollars or less; or
(ii) For taxpayers filing any other return, federal adjusted gross
income is forty-three thousand dollars or less.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the dollar
amounts provided in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section by
the same percentage used to adjust individual income tax brackets under
subsection (3) of section 77-2715.03.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (14) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(14)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by a percentage of the
social security benefits that are received and included in federal
adjusted gross income. The pertinent percentage shall be:
(i) Five percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(ii) Forty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(iii) Sixty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(iv) One hundred percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of
-14-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
1986, as amended.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, social security benefits means
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (13) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(15)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may make a one-time election
within two calendar years after the date of his or her retirement from
the military to exclude income received as a military retirement benefit
by the individual to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income
and as provided in this subdivision. The individual may elect to exclude
forty percent of his or her military retirement benefit income for seven
consecutive taxable years beginning with the year in which the election
is made or may elect to exclude fifteen percent of his or her military
retirement benefit income for all taxable years beginning with the year
in which he or she turns sixty-seven years of age.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may exclude one hundred percent of the military retirement
benefit income received by such individual to the extent included in
federal adjusted gross income.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, military retirement benefit
means retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to
service in the uniformed services of the United States for personal
services performed by an individual prior to his or her retirement. The
term includes retirement benefits described in this subdivision that are
-15-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
reported to the individual on either:
(i) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Department of Defense; or
(ii) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the
United States Office of Personnel Management.
(16) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received as
a Segal AmeriCorps Education Award, to the extent such amount is included
in federal adjusted gross income.
(17) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received by
or on behalf of a firefighter for cancer benefits under the Firefighter
Cancer Benefits Act to the extent included in federal adjusted gross
income.
(18) There shall be subtracted from the federal adjusted gross
income of individuals any amount received by the individual as student
loan repayment assistance under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act, to the
extent such amount is included in federal adjusted gross income.
(19) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2023, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
retired individual who was employed full time as a firefighter or
certified law enforcement officer for at least twenty years and who is at
least sixty years of age as of the end of the taxable year may reduce his
or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount of health insurance
premiums paid by such individual during the taxable year, to the extent
such premiums were not already deducted in determining the individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(20) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
-16-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amounts received as annuities under the Civil Service Retirement System
which were earned for being employed by the federal government, to the
extent such amounts are included in federal adjusted gross income.
(21) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a member of the Nebraska National Guard may exclude one
hundred percent of the income received from any of the following sources
to the extent such income is included in the individual's federal
adjusted gross income:
(a) Serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status such as members attending
drills, annual training, and military schools and members who are serving
in a 32 U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational
support duty status;
(b) Employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with
the Nebraska National Guard; or
(c) Serving in a state active duty status.
(22)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amount of interest and principal balance of medical debt discharged under
the Medical Debt Relief Act, to the extent included in such individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amount of contributions
made to the Medical Debt Relief Fund, to the extent not deducted for
federal income tax purposes.
(23) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
-17-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
individual who is a qualifying employee as defined in section 77-3108 may
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount allowed
under section 77-3111.
(24) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amounts allowed to be
deducted pursuant to section 77-27,242.
(25) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net
capital loss that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver
bullion to the extent such loss is included in federal adjusted gross
income except that such loss shall not be added if the loss is derived
from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any retirement
plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the purposes of this
subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section 77-2704.66.
(26) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all
taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any
net capital gain that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or
silver bullion to the extent such gain is included in federal adjusted
gross income except that such gain shall not be subtracted if the gain is
derived from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any
retirement plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the
purposes of this subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section
77-2704.66.
(27)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2027, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount contributed
to a first-time home buyer savings account under the First-Time Home
-18-

LB938 LB938
2026 2026
Buyer Savings Account Act not to exceed five thousand dollars for
individual taxpayers or ten thousand dollars for married filing jointly
taxpayers and, to the extent included, by an amount equal to any interest
and other income earned during the taxable year on the investment of
money in a first-time home buyer savings account. Any subtraction taken
under this subdivision is subject to recapture under subdivision (27)(b)
of this section.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2027, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be increased by any amount recaptured
for the taxable year pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 10. Original section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-19-